Utah statutes.
23-19-15.   License agents -- Authority -- Bond -- Compensation --
Violations.
(1)  The director of the division may designate wildlife license agents to
sell licenses, permits, and tags.
(2)  Wildlife license agents may:
(a)  sell licenses, permits, and tags to all eligible applicants, except those
licenses, permits, and tags specified in Subsection 23-19-16(2) which may be
sold only by the division; and
(b)  collect a fee for each license, permit, or tag sold.
(3)  A wildlife license agent shall receive:
(a)  for any wildlife license, permit, or tag having a fee $10 or less and
greater than $1, 50 cents for each wildlife license, permit, or tag sold; and
(b)  for any wildlife license, permit, or tag having a fee greater than $10,
5% of the fee.
(4)  The division may require wildlife license agents to obtain a bond in a
reasonable amount.
(5) (a)  As directed by the division, each wildlife license agent shall:
(i)  report all sales to the division; and
(ii)  submit all of the fees obtained from the sale of licenses, permits, and
tags less the remuneration provided in Subsection (3).
(b)  If a wildlife license agent fails to pay the amount due, the division may
assess a penalty of 20% of the amount due.  All delinquent payments shall bear
interest at the rate of 1% per month.  If the amount due is not paid because
of bad faith or fraud, the division shall assess a penalty of 100% of the
total amount due together with interest.
(c)  All fees, except the remuneration provided in Subsection (3), shall:
(i)  be kept separate from the private funds of the wildlife license agents;
and
(ii)  belong to the state.
(6)  A wildlife license agent may not intentionally:
(a)  fail to date or misdate a license, permit, or tag; or
(b)  issue a license to any person until that person furnishes proof of having
passed a division-approved hunter education course as provided in Section
23-19-11 or furnishes proof of having passed a division-approved fur harvester
education course as provided in Section 23-19-11.5.
(7) (a)  Except as provided in Subsections (7)(b) and (c), a violation of this
section is a class B misdemeanor.
(b)  A violation of this section is a class A misdemeanor if the aggregate
amount required under Subsection (5)(a):
(i)  is at least $1,000, but less than $10,000;
(ii)  is not submitted for one or more months; and
(iii)  remains uncollectable.
(c)  A violation of this section is a felony of the third degree if the
aggregate amount required under Subsection (5)(a):
(i)  is $10,000 or more;
(ii)  is not submitted for one or more months; and
(iii)  remains uncollectable.
(8)  Violation of any provision of this section may be cause for revocation of
the wildlife license agent authorization.
